Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
CONTEST OF VALIDITY OR ENFORCEMENT

Note

Part heading reenacted by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-605 Notice of registration of order.
(a) When a support order or income withholding order issued in another state
or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this
State shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by
a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information
accompanying the order.

(b) A notice shall inform the nonregistering
party:

(1) That a registered order is enforceable as of the
date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of
this State;

(2) That a hearing to contest the validity or
enforcement of the registered order must be requested within twenty days after
notice unless the registered order is under section 576B-707;

(3) That failure to contest the validity or
enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in
confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged
arrearages; and

(4) Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

(c) If the registering party asserts that two
or more orders are in effect, a notice shall also:

(1) Identify the two or more orders and the order
alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the
consolidated arrears, if any;

(2) Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a
determination of which is the controlling order;

(3) State that the procedures provided in subsection
(b) apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

(4) State that failure to contest the validity or
enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner
may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

(d) Upon registration of an income withholding
order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering
tribunal shall notify the obligor's employer pursuant to sections 571-52,
571-52.2, 571-52.3, 576D-14, and 576E-16.

(e) For the purposes of this section, service
of the notice shall be by personal service or certified mail, return receipt
requested. After initial service is effected, additional service upon a party
shall be satisfied by regular mail to the party's last known address. In any
child support enforcement proceedings subsequent to an order, upon a showing
that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, notice
of service of process shall be presumed to be satisfied upon delivery of
written notice to the most recent residential or employer address on file with
the state case registry. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 270, §2; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next